Hawaii statutes.
§667-33 Recordation of
affidavit, conveyance document; effect. (a) The affidavit required under
section 667-32 and the conveyance document shall be recorded no earlier
than ten days after the public sale is held but not later
than forty-five days after the public sale is held. The affidavit and the
conveyance document may be recorded separately and on different days. After
the recordation, the foreclosing mortgagee shall mail or deliver a recorded
copy to those persons entitled to receive the public notice of the public sale
under section 667-27(c).

(b) When both the affidavit
and the conveyance document are recorded:

(1) The sale of the mortgaged property is considered
completed;

(2) All persons claiming by, through, or under the
mortgagor and all other persons having liens on the mortgaged property junior
to the lien of the foreclosing mortgagee shall be forever barred of and from
any and all right, title, interest, and claims at law or in equity in and to
the mortgaged property and every part of the mortgaged property, except as
otherwise provided by law;

(3) The lien of the foreclosing mortgagee and all
liens junior in priority to the lien of a foreclosing mortgagee shall be
automatically extinguished from the mortgaged property; and

(4) The purchaser shall be entitled to immediate and
exclusive possession of the mortgaged property.

(c) The mortgagor and any
person claiming by, through, or under the mortgagor and who is remaining in
possession of the mortgaged property after the recordation of the affidavit and
the conveyance document shall be considered a tenant at sufferance subject to
eviction or ejectment. The purchaser may bring an action in the nature of
summary possession under chapter 666, ejectment, or trespass or may bring any
other appropriate action in a court where the mortgaged property is located to
obtain a writ of possession, a writ of assistance, or any other relief. In any
such action, the court shall award the prevailing party its reasonable attorney's
fees and costs and all other reasonable fees and costs, all of which are to be
paid for by the non-prevailing party. [L 1998, c 122, pt of §1; am L 2012, c 182, §23]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next